Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; PROMISE FELLOW PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Alliance With Youth. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to the Minnesota Alliance With Youth to improve student attendance and academic engagement through the Promise Fellow program: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The Promise Fellow program must form partnerships with AmeriCorps members, individual schools, school districts, charter schools, and community organizations to provide attendance and academic engagement intervention services. Services may include family and caregiver outreach and engagement, academic support, connection to out-of-school activities and resources, and individual and small group mentoring designed to help students return to and maintain consistent school attendance. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota Alliance With Youth must promote Promise Fellow program opportunities throughout the state. new text end